Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2231
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-2231 to 85-2238 shall be known and may be cited as the Community College Aid Act.

Laws 2012, LB946, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB243, § 22.